Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-331
Commission; land; exchange; when.

The commission is hereby authorized and empowered to exchange land owned by the commission for other lands when the acquisition of the other lands involved in the exchange would, in the opinion of the commission, provide greater utility or value to the commission and materially aid in the promulgation of the basic duties and purposes of the commission. Any such exchange shall be made on the basis of dollar-for-dollar appraised valuation.

Laws 1959, c. 435, § 1, p. 1463;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 81-805.02;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 89.